Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.370

Child care—Legislative intent.

The legislature recognizes that supporting child care for employees of public and private organizations is a worthwhile pursuit. To further the goals of affordable, accessible, and quality child care for working parents, the legislature intends to provide for the development of self-supporting child care programs for employees of state government.

[ 1993 c 194 s 1; 1984 c 162 s 1.]